mg_MG.aff
# mg_MG.aff - affix file for myspell-mg
#
#   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#   the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
#   (at your option) any later version.
#
#   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#   GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
#   along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
#   Foundation, Inc., 675 Mass Ave, Cambridge, MA 02139, USA.


# ty vakina : https://www.chromium.org/developers/how-tos/editing-the-spell-checking-dictionaries
# exemple : https://github.com/elastic/hunspell/blob/master/dicts/en_US/en_US.aff
# ty complete tsara https://manpages.ubuntu.com/manpages/trusty/en/man4/hunspell.4.html
#

SET UTF-8

TRY aeiuonrtldspjgkmhbcyfvwzqxSNRTLCGDMPHBEAUYOFIVKWZQJX

REP 2
REP ha a
REP a ha

#MAP

KEY azertyuiop|qsdfghjklmù|wxcvbn|aéz|yèu|iço|oàp|aqz|zse|edr|rft|tgy|yhu|uji|iko|olpm|qws|sxd|dcf|fvg|gbh|hnj

ICONV 42
ICONV ’ '
ICONV ʼ '
ICONV ﬃ ffi
ICONV ﬄ ffl
ICONV ﬀ ff
ICONV ﬅ ft
ICONV ﬁ fi
ICONV ﬂ fl
ICONV ﬆ st
ICONV ſ s
ICONV à à
ICONV â â
ICONV ä ä
ICONV é é
ICONV è è
ICONV ê ê
ICONV ë ë
ICONV î î
ICONV ï ï
ICONV ô ô
ICONV ö ö
ICONV ù ù
ICONV û û
ICONV ü ü
ICONV ÿ ÿ
ICONV ç ç
ICONV À À
ICONV Â Â
ICONV Ä Ä
ICONV É É
ICONV È È
ICONV Ê Ê
ICONV Ë Ë
ICONV Î Î
ICONV Ï Ï
ICONV Ô Ô
ICONV Ö Ö
ICONV Ù Ù
ICONV Û Û
ICONV Ü Ü
ICONV Ÿ Ÿ
ICONV Ç Ç

OCONV 1
OCONV ' ’



FLAG long

FULLSTRIP

NEEDAFFIX ()

FORBIDDENWORD {}

CIRCUMFIX Xx

KEEPCASE ||

NOSUGGEST --



BREAK 5
BREAK -
BREAK .
BREAK ·
BREAK ‘
BREAK '


PFX Nu Y 2
PFX Nu 0 0/Xx .
PFX Nu 0 h/Xx .

PFX Ii Y 2
PFX Ii 0 i/Xx [aeio]
PFX Ii 0 hi/Xx [aeio]

PFX Ij Y 4
PFX Ij 0 i/Xx [aeio]
PFX Ij 0 ni/Xx [aeio]
PFX Ij 0 hi/Xx [aeio]
PFX Ij 0 ki/Xx [aeio]

PFX Ma Y 4
PFX Ma 0 man [aeio]
PFX Ma 0 nan [aeio]
PFX Ma 0 han [aeio]
PFX Ma 0 kan [aeio]

PFX Mb Y 5
PFX Mb 0 m [aeio]
PFX Mb 0 n [aeio]
PFX Mb 0 h [aeio]
PFX Mb 0 k [aeio]
PFX Mb 0 f [aeio]

PFX Mc Y 3
PFX Mc 0 n [aeio]
PFX Mc 0 h [aeio]
PFX Mc 0 k [aeio]

PFX Mi N 4
PFX Mi 0 mi [aeio]
PFX Mi 0 ni [aeio]
PFX Mi 0 hi [aeio]
PFX Mi 0 ki [aeio]

PFX Mj N 4
PFX Mj 0 mampi [aeio]
PFX Mj 0 nampi [aeio]
PFX Mj 0 hampi [aeio]
PFX Mj 0 kampi [aeio]

PFX Mm Y 1
PFX Mm 0 mi/Xx [aeio]

PFX Mn Y 1
PFX Mn 0 man/Xx [aeio]

PFX Mt N 1
PFX Mt 0 m .

PFX Mv Y 1
PFX Mv 0 m/Xx .

PFX Mu N 1
PFX Mu 0 mi .

SFX O1 Y 1
SFX O1 na ko/Xx na [ahy]

SFX O2 Y 3
SFX O2 na m/Xx na [anao]
SFX O2 na n/Xx na [anao]
SFX O2 na nao/Xx na [anao]

SFX D2 Y 6
SFX D2 0 n/Xx [^y] [ndry]
SFX D2 0 m/Xx [^y] [beloha]
SFX D2 0 nao/Xx [^y] [ianao]
SFX D2 y in/Xx y [ndry]
SFX D2 y im/Xx y [beloha]
SFX D2 y inao/Xx y [ianao]

SFX O3 Y 1
SFX O3 na ny/Xx na [azy]

SFX D3 Y 2
SFX D3 0 ny/Xx [^y] [izy]
SFX D3 y iny/Xx y [izy]

SFX O4 Y 1
SFX O4 na nay/Xx na [anay]

SFX O5 Y 1
SFX O5 na ntsika/Xx na [antsika]

SFX D5 Y 2
SFX D5 0 ntsika/Xx . [isika]
SFX D5 y intsika/Xx y [isika]

SFX O6 Y 1
SFX O6 na nareo/Xx na [anareo]

SFX D6 Y 2
SFX D6 0 nareo/Xx [^y] [ianareo]
SFX D6 y inareo/Xx y [ianareo]

PFX Ha Y 6
PFX Ha a ha/Xx a
PFX Ha a ka/Xx a
PFX Ha h fah/Xx h
PFX Ha 0 fah/Xx [a]
PFX Ha h pah/Xx h
PFX Ha 0 pah/Xx [a]

PFX Fa Y 6
PFX Fa 0 an/Xx .
PFX Fa 0 nan/Xx .
PFX Fa 0 han/Xx .
PFX Fa 0 kan/Xx .
PFX Fa 0 fan/Xx .
PFX Fa 0 pan/Xx .

PFX Fb Y 1
PFX Fb 0 f/Xx .

PFX Fc Y 4
PFX Fc 0 fan/Xx .
PFX Fc 0 pan/Xx .
PFX Fc 0 fah/Xx .
PFX Fc 0 pah/Xx .

PFX Mg Y 4
PFX Mg 0 ifan/Xx [aeio]
PFX Mg 0 nifan [aeio]
PFX Mg 0 hifan [aeio]
PFX Mg 0 kifan [aeio]

PFX Dh Y 2
PFX Dh 0 ifan/Xx [aeio]
PFX Dh 0 hifan/Xx [aeio]

PFX Mk Y 4
PFX Mk 0 mifan/Xx [aeio]
PFX Mk 0 nifan [aeio]
PFX Mk 0 hifan [aeio]
PFX Mk 0 kifan [aeio]

PFX M2 N 4
PFX M2 0 mifamp .
PFX M2 0 nifamp .
PFX M2 0 hifamp .
PFX M2 0 ifamp .

PFX M3 N 4
PFX M3 0 mifampi .
PFX M3 0 nifampi .
PFX M3 0 hifampi .
PFX M3 0 ifampi .

PFX M4 N 3
PFX M4 0 nifampi/Xx .
PFX M4 0 hifampi/Xx .
PFX M4 0 ifampi/Xx .

PFX M5 N 6
PFX M5 0 miak/Xx .
PFX M5 0 niak/Xx .
PFX M5 0 hiak/Xx .
PFX M5 0 mian/Xx .
PFX M5 0 nian/Xx .
PFX M5 0 hian/Xx .

PFX M6 Y 4
PFX M6 0 fifampi/Xx .
PFX M6 0 nifampi/Xx .
PFX M6 0 hifampi/Xx .
PFX M6 0 ifampi/Xx .

PFX Mp N 1
PFX Mp 0 mpan .

PFX Mq N 1
PFX Mq 0 mp .

PFX Tp Y 4
PFX Tp 0 0/Xx .
PFX Tp 0 n/Xx .
PFX Tp 0 h/Xx .
PFX Tp 0 k/Xx .

PFX Tt N 1
PFX Tt 0 t .

PFX Fi Y 3
PFX Fi 0 fi/Xx .
PFX Fi 0 pi/Xx .
PFX Fi 0 mpi/Xx .

PFX Al Y 5
PFX Al 0 ampan/Xx .
PFX Al 0 nampan/Xx .
PFX Al 0 hampan/Xx .
PFX Al 0 kampan/Xx .
PFX Al 0 fampan/Xx .

PFX Am Y 5
PFX Am 0 ampi/Xx .
PFX Am 0 nampi/Xx .
PFX Am 0 hampi/Xx .
PFX Am 0 kampi/Xx .
PFX Am 0 fampi/Xx .

PFX An Y 4
PFX An 0 ampi/Xx .
PFX An 0 nampi/Xx .
PFX An 0 hampi/Xx .
PFX An 0 kampi/Xx .

SFX H1 Y 6
SFX H1 0 m/FaXx a
SFX H1 0 n/FaXx a
SFX H1 0 na/FaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx a
SFX H1 0 am/FaXx [^a]
SFX H1 0 an/FaXx [^a]
SFX H1 0 ana/FaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx [^a]

SFX Hb Y 3
SFX Hb y iam/FbXx y
SFX Hb y ian/FbXx y
SFX Hb y iana/FbO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx y

SFX He Y 3
SFX He ina enam/FiFaXx ina
SFX He ina enan/FiFaXx ina
SFX He ina enana/FiFaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx ina

SFX Hg Y 7
SFX Hg 0 0/HaXx [^y]
SFX Hg 0 m/HaXx [^y]
SFX Hg 0 n/HaXx [^y]
SFX Hg 0 na/HaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx [^y]
SFX Hg y em/HaXx y
SFX Hg y en/HaXx y
SFX Hg y ena/HaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx y

SFX Hk Y 3
SFX Hk ka ham/FaXx ka
SFX Hk ka han/FaXx ka
SFX Hk ka hana/FaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx ka

SFX Hl Y 6
SFX Hl 0 m/FiXx [^y]
SFX Hl 0 n/FiXx [^y]
SFX Hl 0 na/FiO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx [^y]
SFX Hl y em/FiXx y
SFX Hl y en/FiXx y
SFX Hl y ena/FiO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx y

SFX Hm Y 3
SFX Hm 0 m/AmXx [^y]
SFX Hm 0 n/AmXx [^y]
SFX Hm 0 na/AmO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx [^y]

SFX Hn Y 3
SFX Hn a in/AnXx a
SFX Hn a im/AnXx a
SFX Hn a ina/AnO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx a

SFX Ho Y 9
SFX Ho 0 am/FiXx [^ya]
SFX Ho 0 an/FiXx [^ya]
SFX Ho 0 ana/FiO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx [^ya]
SFX Ho 0 m/FiXx a
SFX Ho 0 n/FiXx a
SFX Ho 0 na/FiO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx a
SFX Ho y iam/FiIjXx y
SFX Ho y ian/FiIjXx y
SFX Ho y iana/FiIjO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx y

SFX Vo Y 3
SFX Vo y ivan/FiIjXx y
SFX Vo y ivana/FiIjO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx y
SFX Vo 0 vana/McO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx o

SFX Hp Y 6
SFX Hp 0 m/FaXx [^y]
SFX Hp 0 n/FaXx [^y]
SFX Hp 0 na/FaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx [^y]
SFX Hp y em/FaXx y
SFX Hp y en/FaXx y
SFX Hp y ena/FaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx y

SFX Hq Y 9
SFX Hq aiky ekem/FiXx aiky
SFX Hq aiky eken/FiXx aiky
SFX Hq aiky ekena/FiO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx aiky
SFX Hq aiky ekem/FaXx aiky
SFX Hq aiky eken/FaXx aiky
SFX Hq aiky ekena/FaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx aiky
SFX Hq aiky ekem/AmXx aiky
SFX Hq aiky eken/AmXx aiky
SFX Hq aiky ekena/AmO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx aiky

SFX Hr Y 4
SFX Hr y io/NuD2D3D5D6Xx y
SFX Hr y iam y
SFX Hr y ian y
SFX Hr y iana/FcO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx y

SFX H2 Y 4
SFX H2 y io/IiD2D3D5D6Xx y
SFX H2 y iam/IjXx y
SFX H2 y ian/IjXx y
SFX H2 y iana/IjO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx y

SFX Hs N 16
SFX Hs aiky ekem aiky
SFX Hs aiky eken aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekena aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekeko aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekenao aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekeny aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekentsika aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekenay aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekenareo aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekeo aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekeon aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekeom aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekeonao aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekeony aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekeontsika aiky
SFX Hs aiky ekeonareo aiky

SFX Ht Y 14
SFX Ht 0 zy/NuXx vo
SFX Ht 0 zim/NuXx vo
SFX Ht 0 zin/NuXx vo
SFX Ht 0 zina/NuO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx vo
SFX Ht 0 zam/FaAlXx vo
SFX Ht 0 zan/FaAlXx vo
SFX Ht 0 zana/FaAlO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx vo
SFX Ht ky keza/MnXx ky
SFX Ht ky kezim/FaAlXx ky
SFX Ht ky kezin/FaAlXx ky
SFX Ht ky kezina/FaAlO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx ky
SFX Ht ky kezam/FaAlXx ky
SFX Ht ky kezan/FaAlXx ky
SFX Ht ky kezana/FaAlO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx ky

SFX Hu Y 3
SFX Hu na mo/NuDhD2D3D5D6Xx na
SFX Hu na mina/McO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx na
SFX Hu na mana/McFaMgO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx na

SFX Hv Y 3
SFX Hv na m/FaXx .
SFX Hv na n/FaXx .
SFX Hv na na/FaO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx [^y]
