mg_MG.dic
adala/HgDiMfApAj
adana/MiMjHlHmHnAp
ady/MiMjHoVoDaDoApAj
adidy/MiHoDaDoApAj
adina/MiHlHmHnMaHp
adonadona/MiMjHlAs
afaka/MaHkDkDaAt
afana/MiMj
afina/MiMjHeMaHsDfDg
ahy/FiMaHoVoDaDjTj
ahotra/Mi
aiky/MiMjHqHs
aina/MiMjHlHmHnDlAg
ainga/MiMjFiDmDi
ainginaingina/Mi
aingitra/MiMjDrAg
aingitraingitra/MiMjDrAg
aivoka/Mt
aiza/Tt
aizana/Ma
akaiky/MaHtDsAj
akana/MiMjHo
akanakana/MiMjHoFiAk
akanjo/MiMjHoDaAj
akatra/MiMjDr
ako/Ma
akofa/Ma
alahelo/MbHoVoM2
aloka/MiMjDrAgDs
alona/MiMjHo
amany/MbDbHbAj
ambaka/MaHpDiMg
ambana/MaHpDtMg
ambany/MaHoMgFa
ambara/MaHoMgFaDv
ambina/MiMaDfHeMk
ambo/MiMjHo
ampatra/MiFaDr
ampy/MiMaTjHrMp
ampirina/MbMqHu
ampofo/MiMaHoHl
ampoka/MiMa/Ky
anaka/Mu
anana/FaAdHv
anatra/MiMaMkM3Dp
andevo/MaHtMp
andraikitra/MiKe
andrana/MaHu
andranandrana/Mi
andrandra/MiDiDm
andrefana/MaM5
andry/MiM3Sa
andrina/Ma
andro/MaMpH1
angana/MiMpH1
angatra/MiDr
angavy/MiHoH2
hendry/HgDe
